District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.30

Delegates.

(a)

A membership corporation may provide in its articles of incorporation or bylaws for delegates.

(b)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

(1)

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of delegates including their selection and removal;

(2)

Calling, noticing, holding, and conducting meetings of delegates; and

(3)

Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

(c)

An assembly or other organized group of delegates constitutes a designated body if it has been vested with powers of the board of directors under the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720